Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1616
Personal service of process outside state.

Personal service of any process in an action under the Consumer Protection Act may be made upon any person outside the state if such person has engaged in conduct in violation of the act which has had impact in this state which the act prohibits.

Laws 1974, LB 1028, § 23;

Laws 2002, LB 1278, § 32.